Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.245

Investigatory powers—Proceedings for contempt.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the director or any officer designated by the director may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the director deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

In case of wilful failure on the part of a person to comply with a subpoena lawfully issued by the director, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to matters regarding which the witness may be lawfully interrogated, the superior court of any county, on application of the director and after satisfactory evidence of wilful disobedience, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify therein.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 13 s 3.]